Utah statutes.
49-14-202.   Participation of employers -- Requirements -- Supplemental
programs -- Full participation in system.
(1)  An employer that employs public safety service employees and is required
by Section 49-12-202 or 49-13-202 to be a participating employer in the Public
Employees' Contributory Retirement System or the Public Employees'
Noncontributory Retirement System shall cover all its public safety service
employees under one of the following systems or plans:
(a)  Chapter 12, Public Employees' Contributory Retirement Act;
(b)  Chapter 13, Public Employees' Noncontributory Retirement Act;
(c)  Chapter 14, Public Safety Contributory Retirement Act;
(d)  Chapter 15, Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement Act; or
(e)  Chapter 23, New Public Safety and Firefighter Tier II Contributory
Retirement Act.
(2)  An employer that covers its public safety service employees under
Subsection (1)(c) is a participating employer in this system.
(3)  If a participating employer under Subsection (1) covers any of its public
safety service employees under the Public Safety Contributory Retirement
System or the Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement System, that
participating employer shall cover all of its public safety service employees
under one of those systems, except for a public safety service employee
initially entering employment with a participating employer on or after July
1, 2011.
(4)  A participating employer may not withdraw from this system.
(5)  In addition to their participation in the system, participating employers
may provide or participate in any additional public or private retirement,
supplemental or defined contribution plan, either directly or indirectly, for
their employees.
(6)  An employer may not elect to participate in this system after July 1,
1989.
